Illinois, session 104th, HB3031.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 14-1, 14-3.1, 14-4, 14-5, and 6as follows: 7    (10 ILCS 5/13-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 13-1)8    Sec. 13-1. In counties not under township organization, 9the county board of commissioners shall at its meeting in July 10in each even-numbered year appoint in each election precinct 5 11capable and discreet persons meeting the qualifications of 12Section 13-4 to be judges of election. Where neither voting 13machines nor electronic, mechanical or electric voting systems 14are used, the county board may, for any precinct with respect 15to which the board considers such action necessary or 16desirable in view of the number of voters, and shall for 17general elections for any precinct containing more than 600 18registered voters, appoint in addition to the 5 judges of 19election a team of 5 tally judges. In such precincts the judges 20of election shall preside over the election during the hours 21the polls are open, and the tally judges, with the assistance 22of the holdover judges designated pursuant to Section 13-6.2, 23shall count the vote after the closing of the polls. However,   HB3031- 2 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1the County Board of Commissioners may appoint 3 judges of 2election to serve in lieu of the 5 judges of election otherwise 3required by this Section (1) to serve in any emergency 4referendum, or in any odd-year regular election or in any 5special primary or special election called for the purpose of 6filling a vacancy in the office of representative in the 7United States Congress or to nominate candidates for such 8purpose or (2) if the county board passes an ordinance to 9reduce the number of judges of election to 3 for primary 10elections. The tally judges shall possess the same 11qualifications and shall be appointed in the same manner and 12with the same division between political parties as is 13provided for judges of election.14    In addition to such precinct judges, the county board of 15commissioners shall appoint special panels of 3 judges each, 16who shall possess the same qualifications and shall be 17appointed in the same manner and with the same division 18between political parties as is provided for other judges of 19election. The number of such panels of judges required shall 20be determined by regulations of the State Board of Elections 21which shall base the required numbers of special panels on the 22number of registered voters in the jurisdiction or the number 23of vote by mail ballots voted at recent elections, or any 24combination of such factors. The county board of commissioners 25may, at its discretion, appoint a judge of election who is 26unaffiliated with a political party.  HB3031- 3 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1    Such appointment shall be confirmed by the court as 2provided in Section 13-3 of this Article. No more than 3 3persons of the same political party or, if the county board of 4commissioners appoints a judge unaffiliated with a political 5party, 2 persons of the same political party and one person who 6is unaffiliated with a political party, shall be appointed 7judges of the same election precinct or election judge panel. 8The appointment shall be made in the following manner in each 9election precinct: (1) if the county board of commissioners 10does not appoint a judge unaffiliated with a political party 11in an election precinct, the The county board of commissioners 12shall select and approve 3 persons as judges of election in the 13each election precinct from a certified list, furnished by the 14chair of the County Central Committee of the first leading 15political party in such precinct; and the county board of 16commissioners shall also select and approve 2 persons as 17judges of election in the each election precinct from a 18certified list, furnished by the chair of the County Central 19Committee of the second leading political party; or (2) if the 20county board of commissioners does appoint a judge 21unaffiliated with a political party in an election precinct, 22the county board of commissioners shall select and approve one 23person who is unaffiliated with a political party as a judge of 24election in the precinct who makes application in a manner 25prescribed by the county board of commissioners, the county 26board of commissioners shall select and approve 2 persons as   HB3031- 4 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1judges of election in the election precinct from a certified 2list, furnished by the chair of the County Central Committee 3of the first leading political party in such precinct, and the 4county board of commissioners shall select and approve 2 5persons as judges of election in the election precinct from a 6certified list, furnished by the chair of the County Central 7Committee of the second leading political party. However, if 8only 3 judges of election serve in each election precinct, no 9more than 2 persons of the same political party or, if the 10county board of commissioners appoints a judge unaffiliated 11with a political party, one person from each political party 12and one person who is unaffiliated with a political party, 13shall be judges of election in the same election precinct; and 14the appointment of judges which political party is entitled to 152 judges of election and which political party is entitled to 16one judge of election shall be determined in the same manner as 17set forth in the next two preceding sentences with regard to 5 18election judges in each precinct. Such certified list shall be 19filed with the county clerk not less than 10 days before the 20annual meeting of the county board of commissioners. Such list 21shall be arranged according to precincts. The chair of each 22county central committee shall, insofar as possible, list 23persons who reside within the precinct in which they are to 24serve as judges. However, he may, in his sole discretion, 25submit the names of persons who reside outside the precinct 26but within the county embracing the precinct in which they are   HB3031- 5 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1to serve. He must, however, submit the names of at least 2 2residents of the precinct for each precinct in which his party 3is to have up to 3 judges and must submit the name of at least 4one resident of the precinct for each precinct in which his 5party is to have up to 2 judges. The county board of 6commissioners shall acknowledge in writing to each county 7chair the names of all persons submitted on such certified 8list and the total number of persons listed thereon. If no such 9list is filed or such list is incomplete (that is, no names or 10an insufficient number of names are furnished for certain 11election precincts), the county board of commissioners shall 12make or complete such list from the names contained in the 13supplemental list provided for in Section 13-1.1. The election 14judges shall hold their office for 2 years from their 15appointment, and until their successors are duly appointed in 16the manner provided in this Act. The county board of 17commissioners shall fill all vacancies in the office of judge 18of election at any time in the manner provided in this Act.19(Source: P.A. 100-337, eff. 8-25-17; 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 20    (10 ILCS 5/13-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 13-2)21    Sec. 13-2. In counties under the township organization the 22county board shall at its meeting in July in each 23even-numbered year except in counties containing a population 24of 3,000,000 inhabitants or over and except when such judges 25are appointed by election commissioners, select in each   HB3031- 6 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1election precinct in the county, 5 capable and discreet 2persons to be judges of election who shall possess the 3qualifications required by this Act for such judges. Where 4neither voting machines nor electronic, mechanical or electric 5voting systems are used, the county board may, for any 6precinct with respect to which the board considers such action 7necessary or desirable in view of the number of voters, and 8shall for general elections for any precinct containing more 9than 600 registered voters, appoint in addition to the 5 10judges of election a team of 5 tally judges. In such precincts 11the judges of election shall preside over the election during 12the hours the polls are open, and the tally judges, with the 13assistance of the holdover judges designated pursuant to 14Section 13-6.2, shall count the vote after the closing of the 15polls. The tally judges shall possess the same qualifications 16and shall be appointed in the same manner and with the same 17division between political parties as is provided for judges 18of election.19    However, the county board may appoint 3 judges of election 20to serve in lieu of the 5 judges of election otherwise required 21by this Section (1) to serve in any emergency referendum, or in 22any odd-year regular election or in any special primary or 23special election called for the purpose of filling a vacancy 24in the office of representative in the United States Congress 25or to nominate candidates for such purpose or (2) if the county 26board passes an ordinance to reduce the number of judges of   HB3031- 7 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1election to 3 for primary elections.2    In addition to such precinct judges, the county board 3shall appoint special panels of 3 judges each, who shall 4possess the same qualifications and shall be appointed in the 5same manner and with the same division between political 6parties as is provided for other judges of election. The 7number of such panels of judges required shall be determined 8by regulations of the State Board of Elections, which shall 9base the required number of special panels on the number of 10registered voters in the jurisdiction or the number of 11absentee ballots voted at recent elections or any combination 12of such factors. The county board may, at its discretion, 13appoint a judge of election who is unaffiliated with a 14political party.15    No more than 3 persons of the same political party shall be 16appointed judges in the same election district or undivided 17precinct. The election of the judges of election in each the 18various election precinct precincts shall be made in the 19following manner: (1) if the county board does not appoint a 20judge unaffiliated with a political party in an election 21precinct, the The county board shall select and approve 3 of 22the election judges in the each precinct from a certified list 23furnished by the chair of the County Central Committee of the 24first leading political party in such election precinct and 25shall also select and approve 2 judges of election in the each 26election precinct from a certified list furnished by the chair   HB3031- 8 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1of the County Central Committee of the second leading 2political party in such election precinct; or (2) if the 3county board does appoint a judge unaffiliated with a 4political party in an election precinct, the county board 5shall select and approve one person who is unaffiliated with a 6political party as a judge of election in the precinct who 7makes application in a manner prescribed by the county board, 8the county board of commissioners shall select and approve 2 9persons as judges of election in the election precinct from a 10certified list, furnished by the chair of the County Central 11Committee of the first leading political party in such 12precinct and the county board shall also select and approve 2 13persons as judges of election in the election precinct from a 14certified list, furnished by the chair of the County Central 15Committee of the second leading political party. However, if 16only 3 judges of election serve in each election precinct, no 17more than 2 persons of the same political party or, if the 18county board appoints a judge unaffiliated with a political 19party, one person from each political party and one person who 20is unaffiliated with a political party, shall be judges of 21election in the same election precinct; and the appointment of 22judges which political party is entitled to 2 judges of 23election and which political party is entitled to one judge of 24election shall be determined in the same manner as set forth in 25the next two preceding sentences with regard to 5 election 26judges in each precinct. The respective County Central   HB3031- 9 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1Committee chair shall notify the county board by June 1 of each 2odd-numbered year immediately preceding the annual meeting of 3the county board whether or not such certified list will be 4filed by such chair. Such list shall be arranged according to 5precincts. The chair of each county central committee shall, 6insofar as possible, list persons who reside within the 7precinct in which they are to serve as judges. However, he may, 8in his sole discretion, submit the names of persons who reside 9outside the precinct but within the county embracing the 10precinct in which they are to serve. He must, however, submit 11the names of at least 2 residents of the precinct for each 12precinct in which his party is to have up to 3 judges and must 13submit the name of at least one resident of the precinct for 14each precinct in which his party is to have up to 2 judges. 15Such certified list, if filed, shall be filed with the county 16clerk not less than 20 days before the annual meeting of the 17county board. The county board shall acknowledge in writing to 18each county chair the names of all persons submitted on such 19certified list and the total number of persons listed thereon. 20If no such list is filed or the list is incomplete (that is, no 21names or an insufficient number of names are furnished for 22certain election precincts), the county board shall make or 23complete such list from the names contained in the 24supplemental list provided for in Section 13-1.1. Provided, 25further, that in any case where a township has been or shall be 26redistricted, in whole or in part, subsequent to one general   HB3031- 10 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1election for Governor, and prior to the next, the judges of 2election to be selected for all new or altered precincts shall 3be selected in that one of the methods above detailed, which 4shall be applicable according to the facts and circumstances 5of the particular case, but the majority of such judges for 6each such precinct shall be selected from the first leading 7political party, and the minority judges from the second 8leading political party. Provided, further, that in counties 9having a population of 3,000,000 inhabitants or over the 10selection of judges of election shall be made in the same 11manner in all respects as in other counties, except that the 12provisions relating to tally judges are inapplicable to such 13counties and except that the county board shall meet during 14the month of January for the purpose of making such selection, 15each township committeeperson shall assume the 16responsibilities given to the chair of the county central 17committee in this Section for the precincts within his or her 18township, and the township committeeperson shall notify the 19county board by the preceding October 1 whether or not the 20certified list will be filed. Such judges of election shall 21hold their office for 2 years from their appointment and until 22their successors are duly appointed in the manner provided in 23this Act. The county board shall fill all vacancies in the 24office of judges of elections at any time in the manner herein 25provided.26    Such selections under this Section shall be confirmed by   HB3031- 11 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1the circuit court as provided in Section 13-3 of this Article.2(Source: P.A. 100-337, eff. 8-25-17; 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 3    (10 ILCS 5/13-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 13-3)4    Sec. 13-3. After the judges of election have been selected 5and approved as hereinbefore provided, a report of such 6selections shall be made by the county board and filed in the 7circuit court, and application shall then be made by the 8county board to the court for their confirmation and 9appointment, whereupon the court shall enter an order that 10cause be shown, if any exists, against the confirmation and 11appointment of such persons so named on or before the opening 12of the court on a day to be fixed by the court. The county 13board shall immediately give notice of such order and the 14names of all such judges so reported to such court for 15confirmation and their residence and the precinct for which 16they were selected by causing a notice to be published in one 17or more newspapers in the county and if no newspaper be 18published therein then by posting such notice in 5 of the most 19public places in the county. The notice shall state that a list 20of judges of election is available for public inspection in 21the office of the election authority. If no cause to the 22contrary is shown prior to the day fixed, and if, in each 23precinct, at least one judge representing each of the two 24major political parties has been certified by the county clerk 25as having satisfactorily completed within the preceding 6   HB3031- 12 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1months the training course and examination for judges of 2election, as provided in Section 13-2.1 and 13-2.2 of this 3Act, such appointment shall be confirmed by order entered by 4that court.5    If in any precinct the requisite 2 judges have not been so 6certified by the county clerk as having satisfactorily 7completed such course and examination, the county clerk shall 8immediately notify all judges in that precinct, to whose 9appointment there is no other objection, that all such judges 10shall attend the next such course. The county clerk shall then 11certify to the court that all such judges have been so notified 12(and such certification need contain no detail other than a 13mere recital). The appointment of such judges shall then be 14confirmed by order entered by the court. If any judge so 15notified and so confirmed fails to attend the next such 16course, such failure shall subject such judge to possible 17removal from office at the option of the election authority.18    If objections to the appointment of any judge be filed 19prior to the day fixed by the court for confirmation of judges, 20the court shall hear such objections and the evidence 21introduced in support thereof, and shall confirm or refuse to 22confirm such nominations as the interests of the public may 23require. No reasons may be given for the refusal to confirm. If 24any vacancy exists at any time the county board shall, subject 25to the provisions of Section 13-1.1, further report and 26nominate persons to fill such vacancies so existing in the   HB3031- 13 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1manner aforesaid, and a court in the same way shall consider 2such nominations and shall confirm or refuse to confirm the 3same in the manner aforesaid. Upon the confirmation of such 4judges, at any time, a commission shall issue to each of such 5judges, under the seal of such court, and appropriate forms 6shall be prepared by the county clerk of each county for such 7purpose and furnished to the county board, and after 8confirmation and acceptance of such commission, such judges 9shall thereupon become officers of such court. If a vacancy 10occurs so late that nomination by the county board and 11application to and confirmation by the court cannot be had 12before the election, then the court shall, subject to the 13provisions of Section 13-1.1, make an appointment and issue a 14commission to such officer or officers, and when thus 15appointed such officer shall be considered an officer of the 16court and subject to the same rules as if nominated by the 17county board and confirmed by the court, and any judge, 18however appointed, and at whatever time, shall be considered 19an officer of court and be subject to the same control and 20punishment in case of misbehavior. Not more than 10 business 21days after the day of election, the county clerk shall compile 22a list containing the name, address, and party affiliation, if 23any, of each judge of election who served on the day of 24election, and shall preserve such list and make it available 25for public inspection and copying for a period of not more than 26one year from the date of receipt of such list. Copies of such   HB3031- 14 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1list shall be available for purchase at a cost not to exceed 2the cost of duplication. The board has the right, at any time, 3in case of misbehavior or neglect of duty, to remove any judge 4of election and cause such vacancy to be filled in accordance 5with this Act. Except for judges appointed under subsection 6(b) of Section 13-4, the board shall have the right, at any 7time, to remove any judge of election for failing to vote the 8primary ballot of the political party he represents, at a 9primary election at which he served as such judge, and shall 10cause such vacancy to be filled in accordance with this Act. 11The board shall remove any judge of election who, twice during 12the same term of office, fails to provide for the opening of 13the polling place at the time prescribed in Section 17-1 or 14Section 18-2, whichever is applicable, unless such delay can 15be demonstrated by the judge of election to be beyond his or 16her control. In the event that any judge of election is removed 17for cause, the board shall specify such cause in writing and 18make such writing a matter of public record, with a copy to be 19sent to the appropriate county chair who made the initial 20recommendation of the election judge. If any vacancies occur 21or exist more than 15 days before election the judges 22appointed to such places must be confirmed by such court. The 23county board shall not voluntarily remove any judge within 15 24days of such election except for flagrant misbehavior, 25incapacity or dishonesty, and the reason therefor must 26afterward be reported in writing to such court and made a   HB3031- 15 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1matter of public record, with a copy to be sent to the 2appropriate county chair who made the initial recommendation 3of the election judge. Provided further that where a vacancy 4in the office of judge of election exists 20 days or less prior 5to any election in counties having a population of 3,000,000 6or more inhabitants, or where such vacancy exists 10 days or 7less prior to any election in counties having less than 83,000,000 inhabitants, the county clerk shall, subject to the 9provisions of Section 13-1.1, appoint a person of the same 10major political party to fill such vacancy and issue a 11commission thereto. The name of the officer so appointed shall 12be reported to the court as a matter of record and after 13acceptance of such commission such person shall be liable in 14the same manner as officers regularly appointed by the county 15board and confirmed by the court. The county clerk shall have 16the power on election day to remove without cause any judge of 17election appointed by the other judges of election pursuant to 18Section 13-7 and to appoint another judge of election to serve 19for that election. Such substitute judge of election must be 20selected, where possible, pursuant to the provisions of 21Section 13-1.1 and must be qualified in accordance with 22Section 13-4.23    If any precinct has increased in voter registration beyond 24the maximum of 800 provided in Section 11-2, the county clerk 25may appoint one additional judge of election from each 26political party for each 200 voters in excess of 800.  HB3031- 16 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 2    (10 ILCS 5/13-4)  (from Ch. 46, par. 13-4)3    Sec. 13-4. Qualifications. 4    (a) All persons elected or chosen judge of election must: 5(1) be citizens of the United States and entitled to vote at 6the next election, except as provided in subsection (b) or 7(c); (2) be of good repute and character and not subject to the 8registration requirement of the Sex Offender Registration Act; 9(3) be able to speak, read and write the English language; (4) 10be skilled in the four fundamental rules of arithmetic; (5) be 11of good understanding and capable; (6) not be candidates for 12any office at the election and not be elected 13committeepersons; and (7) reside in the precinct in which they 14are selected to act, except that in each precinct, not more 15than one judge of each party may be appointed from outside such 16precinct and not more than one judge unaffiliated with a party 17may be appointed from outside such precinct. Any judge 18selected to serve in any precinct in which he is not entitled 19to vote must reside within and be entitled to vote elsewhere 20within the county which encompasses the precinct in which such 21judge is appointed, except as provided in subsection (b) or 22(c). Such judge must meet the other qualifications of this 23Section. 24    (b) An election authority may establish a program to 25permit a person who is not entitled to vote to be appointed as   HB3031- 17 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1an election judge if, as of the date of the election at which 2the person serves as a judge, he or she: 3        (1) is a U.S. citizen; 4        (2) is a junior or senior in good standing enrolled in 5    a public or private secondary school; 6        (3) has a cumulative grade point average equivalent to 7    at least 3.0 on a 4.0 scale; 8        (4) has the written approval of the principal of the 9    secondary school he or she attends at the time of 10    appointment; 11        (5) has the written approval of his or her parent or 12    legal guardian; 13        (6) has satisfactorily completed the training course 14    for judges of election described in Sections 13-2.1 and 15    13-2.2; and 16        (7) meets all other qualifications for appointment and 17    service as an election judge. 18    No more than one election judge qualifying under this 19subsection may serve per political party per precinct and no 20more than one election judge qualifying under this subsection 21may be unaffiliated with a political party. Prior to 22appointment, a judge qualifying under this subsection must 23certify in writing to the election authority the political 24party the judge chooses to affiliate with or that the judge 25chooses not to affiliate with a political party. 26    Students appointed as election judges under this   HB3031- 18 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1subsection shall not be counted as absent from school on the 2day they serve as judges. 3    (c) An election authority may establish a program to 4permit a person who is not entitled to vote in that precinct or 5county to be appointed as an election judge if, as of the date 6of the election at which the person serves as a judge, he or 7she:8        (1) is a U.S. citizen;9        (2) is currently enrolled in a community college, as 10    defined in the Public Community College Act, or a public 11    or private Illinois university or college;12        (3) has a cumulative grade point average equivalent to 13    at least 3.0 on a 4.0 scale;14        (4) has satisfactorily completed the training course 15    for judges of election described in Sections 13-2.1 and 16    13-2.2; and17        (5) meets all other qualifications for appointment and 18    service as an election judge.19    No more than one election judge qualifying under this 20subsection may serve per political party per precinct and no 21more than one election judge qualifying under this subsection 22may be unaffiliated with a political party. Prior to 23appointment, a judge qualifying under this subsection must 24certify in writing to the election authority the political 25party the judge chooses to affiliate with or that the judge 26chooses not to affiliate with a political party.  HB3031- 19 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1    Students appointed as election judges under this 2subsection shall not be counted as absent from school on the 3day they serve as judges. 4(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 5    (10 ILCS 5/14-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 14-1)6    Sec. 14-1. (a) The board of election commissioners 7established or existing under Article 6 shall, at the time and 8in the manner provided in Section 14-3.1, select and choose 5 9persons, men or women, as judges of election for each precinct 10in such city, village or incorporated town. 11    Where neither voting machines nor electronic, mechanical 12or electric voting systems are used, the board of election 13commissioners may, for any precinct with respect to which the 14board considers such action necessary or desirable in view of 15the number of voters, and shall for general elections for any 16precinct containing more than 600 registered voters, appoint 17in addition to the 5 judges of election a team of 5 tally 18judges. In such precincts the judges of election shall preside 19over the election during the hours the polls are open, and the 20tally judges, with the assistance of the holdover judges 21designated pursuant to Section 14-5.2, shall count the vote 22after the closing of the polls. The tally judges shall possess 23the same qualifications and shall be appointed in the same 24manner and with the same division between political parties as 25is provided for judges of election. The foregoing provisions   HB3031- 20 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1relating to the appointment of tally judges are inapplicable 2in counties with a population of 1,000,000 or more. 3    (b) To qualify as judges the persons must: 4        (1) be citizens of the United States; 5        (2) be of good repute and character and not subject to 6    the registration requirement of the Sex Offender 7    Registration Act; 8        (3) be able to speak, read and write the English 9    language; 10        (4) be skilled in the 4 fundamental rules of 11    arithmetic; 12        (5) be of good understanding and capable; 13        (6) not be candidates for any office at the election 14    and not be elected committeepersons; 15        (7) reside and be entitled to vote in the precinct in 16    which they are selected to serve, except that in each 17    precinct not more than one judge of each party may be 18    appointed from outside such precinct and not more than one 19    judge unaffiliated with a party may be appointed from 20    outside such precinct. Any judge so appointed to serve in 21    any precinct in which he is not entitled to vote must be 22    entitled to vote elsewhere within the county which 23    encompasses the precinct in which such judge is appointed 24    and such judge must otherwise meet the qualifications of 25    this Section, except as provided in subsection (c) or 26    (c-5).   HB3031- 21 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1    (c) An election authority may establish a program to 2permit a person who is not entitled to vote to be appointed as 3an election judge if, as of the date of the election at which 4the person serves as a judge, he or she: 5        (1) is a U.S. citizen; 6        (2) is a junior or senior in good standing enrolled in 7    a public or private secondary school; 8        (3) has a cumulative grade point average equivalent to 9    at least 3.0 on a 4.0 scale; 10        (4) has the written approval of the principal of the 11    secondary school he or she attends at the time of 12    appointment; 13        (5) has the written approval of his or her parent or 14    legal guardian; 15        (6) has satisfactorily completed the training course 16    for judges of election described in Sections 13-2.1, 17    13-2.2, and 14-4.1; and 18        (7) meets all other qualifications for appointment and 19    service as an election judge. 20    No more than one election judge qualifying under this 21subsection may serve per political party per precinct and no 22more than one election judge qualifying under this subsection 23may be unaffiliated with a political party. Prior to 24appointment, a judge qualifying under this subsection must 25certify in writing to the election authority the political 26party the judge chooses to affiliate with or that the judge   HB3031- 22 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1chooses not to affiliate with a political party. 2    Students appointed as election judges under this 3subsection shall not be counted as absent from school on the 4day they serve as judges. 5    (c-5) An election authority may establish a program to 6permit a person who is not entitled to vote in that precinct or 7county to be appointed as an election judge if, as of the date 8of the election at which the person serves as a judge, he or 9she:10        (1) is a U.S. citizen;11        (2) is currently enrolled in a community college, as 12    defined in the Public Community College Act, or a public 13    or private Illinois university or college;14        (3) has a cumulative grade point average equivalent to 15    at least 3.0 on a 4.0 scale;16        (4) has satisfactorily completed the training course 17    for judges of election described in Sections 13-2.1, 18    13-2.2, and 14-4.1; and19        (5) meets all other qualifications for appointment and 20    service as an election judge.21    No more than one election judge qualifying under this 22subsection may serve per political party per precinct and no 23more than one election judge qualifying under this subsection 24may be unaffiliated with a political party. Prior to 25appointment, a judge qualifying under this subsection must 26certify in writing to the election authority the political   HB3031- 23 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1party the judge chooses to affiliate with or that the judge 2chooses not to affiliate with a political party.3    Students appointed as election judges under this 4subsection shall not be counted as absent from school on the 5day they serve as judges. 6    (d) The board of election commissioners may select 2 7additional judges of election, one from each of the major 8political parties, for each 200 voters in excess of 600 in any 9precinct having more than 600 voters as authorized by Section 1011-3. These additional judges must meet the qualifications 11prescribed in this Section. 12(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 13    (10 ILCS 5/14-3.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 14-3.1)14    Sec. 14-3.1. The board of election commissioners shall, 15during the month of July of each even-numbered year, select 16for each election precinct within the jurisdiction of the 17board 5 persons to be judges of election who shall possess the 18qualifications required by this Act for such judges. The board 19of election commissioners may, at its discretion, appoint a 20judge of election who is unaffiliated with a political party. 21The selection shall be made by a county board of election 22commissioners in the following manner in each election 23precinct: (1) if the county board of election commissioners 24does not appoint a judge unaffiliated with a political party 25in an election precinct, the county board of election   HB3031- 24 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1commissioners shall select and approve 3 persons as judges of 2election in the each election precinct from a certified list 3furnished by the chair of the county central committee of the 4first leading political party in that precinct and ; the 5county board of election commissioners also shall select and 6approve 2 persons as judges of election in the each election 7precinct from a certified list furnished by the chair of the 8county central committee of the second leading political party 9in that precinct; or (2) if the county board of election 10commissioners does appoint a judge unaffiliated with a 11political party in an election precinct, the county board of 12election commissioners shall select and approve one person who 13is unaffiliated with a political party as a judge of election 14in the precinct who makes application in a manner prescribed 15by the county board of election commissioners, the county 16board of election commissioners shall select and approve 2 17persons as judges of election in the election precinct from a 18certified list, furnished by the chair of the County Central 19Committee of the first leading political party in such 20precinct, and the county board of election commissioners shall 21select and approve 2 persons as judges of election in the 22election precinct from a certified list, furnished by the 23chair of the County Central Committee of the second leading 24political party. The selection by a municipal board of 25election commissioners shall be made in the following manner 26in each election precinct: for each precinct, (1) if the board   HB3031- 25 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1of election commissioners does not appoint a judge 2unaffiliated with a political party in an election precinct, 3 3judges shall be selected from one of the 2 leading political 4parties and the other 2 judges shall be selected from the other 5leading political party; or (2) if the board of election 6commissioners does appoint a judge unaffiliated with a 7political party in an election precinct, one judge shall be 8selected who is unaffiliated with a political party, 2 judges 9shall be selected from one of the 2 leading political parties, 10and the other 2 judges shall be selected from the other leading 11political party; if applicable, the parties entitled to 3 and 122 judges, respectively, in the several precincts shall be 13determined as provided in Section 14-4. However, a Board of 14Election Commissioners may appoint three judges of election to 15serve in lieu of the 5 judges of election otherwise required by 16this Section to serve in any emergency referendum, or in any 17odd-year regular election or in any special primary or special 18election called for the purpose of filling a vacancy in the 19office of representative in the United States Congress or to 20nominate candidates for such purpose.21    If only 3 judges of election serve in each election 22precinct, no more than 2 persons of the same political party 23shall be judges of election in the same election precinct, and 24the appointment of judges which political party is entitled to 252 judges of election and which political party is entitled to 26one judge of election shall be determined as set forth in this   HB3031- 26 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1Section for a county board of election commissioners' 2selection of 5 election judges in each precinct or in Section 314-4 for a municipal board of election commissioners' 4selection of election judges in each precinct, whichever is 5appropriate. In addition to such precinct judges, the board of 6election commissioners shall appoint special panels of 3 7judges each, who shall possess the same qualifications and 8shall be appointed in the same manner and with the same 9division between political parties as is provided for other 10judges of election. The number of such panels of judges 11required shall be determined by regulation of the State Board 12of Elections, which shall base the required number of special 13panels on the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction 14or the number of absentee ballots voted at recent elections or 15any combination of such factors. A municipal board of election 16commissioners shall make the selections of persons qualified 17under Section 14-1 from certified lists furnished by the chair 18of the respective county central committees, or each ward 19committeeperson in a municipality of 500,000 or more 20inhabitants, of the 2 leading political parties. Lists 21furnished by chairmen of county central committees or ward 22committeepersons, as the case may be, under this Section shall 23be arranged according to precincts. The chair of each county 24central committee or ward committeepersons, as the case may 25be, shall, insofar as possible, list persons who reside within 26the precinct in which they are to serve as judges. However, he   HB3031- 27 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1may, in his sole discretion, submit the names of persons who 2reside outside the precinct but within the county embracing 3the precinct in which they are to serve. He must, however, 4submit the names of at least 2 residents of the precinct for 5each precinct in which his party is to have up to 3 judges and 6must submit the name of at least one resident of the precinct 7for each precinct in which his party is to have up to 2 judges. 8The board of election commissioners shall no later than March 91 of each even-numbered year notify the chairmen of the 10respective county central committees or ward committeepersons, 11as the case may be, of their responsibility to furnish such 12lists, and each such chair shall furnish the board of election 13commissioners with the list for his party on or before May 1 of 14each even-numbered year. The board of election commissioners 15shall acknowledge in writing to each county chair or ward 16committeepersons, as the case may be, the names of all persons 17submitted on such certified list and the total number of 18persons listed thereon. If no such list is furnished or if no 19names or an insufficient number of names are furnished for 20certain precincts, the board of election commissioners shall 21make or complete such list from the names contained in the 22supplemental list provided for in Section 14-3.2. Judges of 23election shall hold their office for 2 years from their 24appointment and until their successors are duly appointed in 25the manner herein provided. The board of election 26commissioners shall, subject to the provisions of Section   HB3031- 28 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b114-3.2, fill all vacancies in the office of judges of election 2at any time in the manner herein provided.3    Such selections under this Section shall be confirmed by 4the court as provided in Section 14-5.5(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 6    (10 ILCS 5/14-4)  (from Ch. 46, par. 14-4)7    Sec. 14-4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the 8The leading political party represented by a minority of all 9the commissioners in the board shall be entitled to 2 of the 10judges in each precinct with an even number, and 3 of the 11judges in each precinct with an odd number, and the other 12leading political party shall be entitled to 3 judges in the 13even and 2 judges in the odd number precincts; and if only 3 14judges of election serve in each precinct, the leading 15political party represented by the minority of all the 16commissioners in the board shall be entitled to one of the 17judges of election in each precinct with an even number, and 2 18of the judges of election in each precinct with an odd number, 19and the other leading political party shall be entitled to 2 20judges of election in the even and one judge of election in the 21odd number precincts; and it shall be the duty of such 22commissioners to observe this division in all respects in 23making such appointments. ;24    (b) If a judge unaffiliated with a political party is 25appointed as a judge of election in a precinct, the leading   HB3031- 29 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1political party represented by a minority of all the 2commissioners and the other leading political party shall both 3be entitled to 2 judges of election in that precinct and, if 4only 3 judges of election serve in that precinct, the leading 5political party represented by the minority of all the 6commissioners in the board and the other leading political 7party shall both be entitled to one judge of election in that 8precinct. The number of precincts in which a judge 9unaffiliated with a political party are appointed shall be the 10same between even and odd number precincts.11    (c) This except that this Section does not apply to 12appointments by county boards of election commissioners under 13Section 14-3.1.14(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 15    (10 ILCS 5/14-5)  (from Ch. 46, par. 14-5)16    Sec. 14-5. After the judges are selected and have agreed 17to serve as provided in Sections 14-1 to 14-4, inclusive, then 18a report of such selections shall be made and filed in the 19court, and application shall then be made by the board to the 20circuit court for their confirmation and appointment, 21whereupon the court shall enter an order that cause be shown, 22if any exists, against the confirmation and appointment of 23such persons so named, on or before the opening of the court on 24a day to be fixed by the court. And the board of commissioners 25shall immediately give notice of such order and the names of   HB3031- 30 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1all such judges so reported to such court for confirmation, 2and their residence and the precinct for which they were 3selected, by causing a notice to be published in one or more 4newspapers in such city, village or incorporated town, and if 5no newspaper be published in such city, village or 6incorporated town, then by posting such notice in 3 of the most 7public places in such city, village or town. The notice shall 8state that a list of judges of election is available for public 9inspection in the office of the election authority. If no 10cause to the contrary is shown prior to the day fixed, and if, 11in each precinct, at least one judge representing each of the 12two major political parties has been certified by the board of 13commissioners as having satisfactorily completed within the 14preceding 6 months the training course and examination for 15judges of election, as provided in Section 14-4.1 of this Act 16such appointments shall be confirmed by order entered by that 17court.18    If in any precinct the requisite 2 judges have not been so 19certified by the board of commissioners as having 20satisfactorily completed such course and examination, the 21board of commissioners shall immediately notify all judges in 22that precinct, to whose appointment there is no other 23objection, that all such judges shall attend the next such 24course. The board of commissioners shall then certify to the 25court that all such judges have been so notified (and such 26certification need contain no detail other than a mere   HB3031- 31 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1recital). The appointment of such judges shall then be 2confirmed by order entered by the court. If any judge so 3notified and so confirmed fails to attend the next such 4course, such failure shall subject such judge to possible 5removal from office at the option of the election authority.6    If objections to the appointment of any such judge is 7filed prior to the day fixed by the court for confirmation of 8judges, the court shall hear such objections and the evidence 9introduced in support thereof, and shall confirm or refuse to 10confirm such nominations, as the interests of the public may 11require. No reasons may be given for the refusal to confirm. If 12any vacancies exist by reason of the action of such board or 13otherwise, at any time, the board of commissioners shall, 14subject to the provisions of Section 14-3.2, further report 15and nominate persons to fill such vacancies so existing in the 16manner aforesaid, and a court in the same way shall consider 17such nominations and shall confirm or refuse to confirm the 18same in the manner aforesaid. Upon the confirmation of such 19judges, at any time, a commission shall issue to each of such 20judges, under the seal of such court, and appropriate forms 21shall be prepared by the board of commissioners for such 22purpose. After such confirmation and acceptance of such 23commission, such judges shall thereupon become officers of 24such court. If a vacancy occurs so late that application to and 25confirmation by the court cannot be had before the election, 26then the board of commissioners shall, subject to the   HB3031- 32 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1provisions of Section 14-3.2, make an appointment and issue a 2commission to such officer or officers, and when thus 3appointed such officer shall be considered an officer of the 4court and subject to the same rules and punishment, in case of 5misbehavior, as if confirmed by the court, and any judge, 6however appointed, and at whatever time, shall be considered 7an officer of court, and be subject to the same control and 8punishment in case of misbehavior. Not more than 10 business 9days after the day of election, the board of election 10commissioners shall compile a list containing the name, 11address, and party affiliation, if any, of each judge of 12election who served on the day of election, and shall preserve 13such list and make it available for public inspection and 14copying for a period of not more than one year from the date of 15receipt of such list. Copies of such list shall be available 16for purchase at a cost not to exceed the cost of duplication. 17The board of commissioners has the right at any time, in case 18of misbehavior or neglect of duty, to remove any judge of 19election, and shall cause such vacancy to be filled in 20accordance with this Act. Except for judges appointed under 21subsection (c) of Section 14-1, the board has the right, at any 22time, to remove any judge of election for failing to vote the 23primary ballot of the political party he represents at a 24primary election at which he served as such judge, and shall 25cause such vacancy to be filled in accordance with this Act. 26The board shall remove any judge of election who, twice during   HB3031- 33 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1the same term of office, fails to provide for the opening of 2the polling place at the time prescribed in Section 17-1 or 3Section 18-2, whichever is applicable, unless such delay can 4be demonstrated by the judge of election to be beyond his or 5her control. In the event that any judge of election is removed 6for cause, the board shall specify such cause in writing and 7make such writing a matter of public record, with a copy to be 8sent to the appropriate county chair who made the initial 9recommendation of the election judges. The judges of election 10must be appointed and confirmed at least 35 days prior to the 11next election.12    If any vacancy shall occur or exist, more than 5 days 13before election the judges appointed to such places must be 14confirmed by such court. Such commissioners shall not 15voluntarily remove any judge within 5 days of such election, 16except for flagrant misbehavior, incapacity or dishonesty, and 17the reasons therefor must afterwards be reported in writing to 18such court and made a matter of public record, with a copy to 19be sent to the appropriate county chair who made the initial 20recommendation of the election judge. If such removal be 21wilful and without cause, the commissioners shall be punished 22for contempt of court and subject to removal. The board of 23election commissioners shall have the power on election day to 24remove without cause any judge of election appointed by the 25other judges of election pursuant to Section 14-6 and to 26appoint another judge of election to serve for that election.   HB3031- 34 -LRB104 03106 SPS 13124 b1Such substitute judge of election must be selected, where 2possible, pursuant to the provisions of Section 14-3.2 and 3must be qualified in accordance with Section 14-1.4(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.)